New Jersey, session 222, S1168.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): New Jersey Transit Corporation service or corporation service means motorbus regular route service and rail passenger service, including light rail service, operated by or under contract to the New Jersey Transit Corporation. "Work First New Jersey" means the Work First New Jersey temporary public assistance program for dependent children and their parents established pursuant to P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.). Workforce training program means an unpaid apprenticeship, internship, or other learning program that provides training and real workplace experience in a particular field. b.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall offer a discount rate when purchasing a ticket or pass for New Jersey Transit Corporation service, to: (1) elementary and secondary school students who use corporation service to commute to and from school; (2) full-time college and university students who use corporation service to commute to and from school; (3) full-time workforce training program students who use corporation service to commute to and from a workforce training program; (4) individuals currently receiving benefits under Work First New Jersey; and (5) a newly employed individual who meets the following criteria: (a) commutes to and from the individuals place of employment using corporation service; (b) has a starting salary equivalent to the State minimum wage; (c) is at least 18 years of age or older and not a full-time student; (d) works a minimum of 20 hours per week; (e) has been unemployed at least 30 days before taking the new position; (f) is not currently receiving public assistance from a Work First New Jersey; and (g) is a resident of New Jersey. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.